tools/fst/lexicon.lexc
LEXICON VnSuffixes
++juq+1vn:juq # ;

! "maannauju" = {maanna:maanna/1a}{u:u/1nv}{ju:juq/1vn} -- gold attests
! juq/1vn's own trailing q dropped at the bare terminal (no ending
! follows), a free spelling variant of the plain "juq" terminal above.
++juq+1vn:ju # ;

! "ju" (above) had only ever been tested at the bare terminal, the same
! "only tested one way" gap this project keeps re-finding -- missing its
! own continuation meant "qaujimajuinnaugatta" (needs "ju" to reach
! innaq/1nn in NnSuffixes) couldn't be found at all, confirmed via the
! real Java analyzer's own output before wiring.
++juq+1vn:ju NounContinuations ;
++juq+1vn:juq NounContinuations ;
++juq+1vn:juq AfterJuqTriggerSuffix ;

! "naammasaqtuit"/"naammasaqtut" need juq/1vn's own "tuq" spelling with
! ITS trailing q ALSO dropped, unlike the j->t conversion the general
! phonology.xfscript rule already produces automatically -- a SEPARATE,
! unconditional literal (not the same mechanism as "ju" above, which is
! V-context-only), confirmed via the real Java analyzer's own output
! (--pipeline) before wiring. ("qanuittuni"/"qanuittunik" superficially
! look like they'd need this too, but gold's chain for those actually
! needs the still-unimplemented "it"/3nv ending before juq -- this
! literal doesn't reach them, don't assume it does.)
++juq+1vn:tu # ;
++juq+1vn:tu NounContinuations ;

! "makkuktunut" (root "makkuk", k-final) needs "tu" with its own k
! preserved, NOT assimilated to "makkuttunut" -- same KGUARD trick as
! titut/tn-sim-p's own "inuktitut" candidate above (a parallel guarded
! path alongside the plain one, general rule still fires normally for
! whatever roots actually need it). Not decomposable by the real Java
! analyzer either (confirmed via --pipeline).
++juq+1vn:KGUARDtu # ;
++juq+1vn:KGUARDtu NounContinuations ;

! "ilinniartulirijiit" needs juq/1vn's "tu" candidate reaching a q-final
! root ("ilinniaq") with the root's own trailing q converted to r --
! same VOICE marker vik/3vn's own q-context candidate already uses
! (Endings_noun.csv's own comment on that entry documents "ilinniaq"'s
! q->r conversion directly), just not previously wired for juq/1vn's
! reduced spelling specifically.
++juq+1vn:VOICEtu NounContinuations ;

! "miik"/1vn (exclamation "Oh, how...!"): Suffixes.csv lists three
! literal spellings (miik/mii/mi) crossed with Nasalization vs
! Suppression actions in q-context -- but gold shows neither action
! cleanly: "nakuqmi"/"nakuqmii" keep the preceding root's q UNCHANGED
! (matching neither Suppression-deletes-it nor Nasalization-converts-it),
! while "nakurmii"/"nakurmiik" (same root "nakuq") DO show Nasalization
! (q->r). Same "wire plain and NASAL-marked variants in parallel, let
! gold's own spelling pick the path" strategy as usiq/1vn's SUPPR/VOICE
! split below -- all 3 spellings wired both plain and NASAL-prefixed (6
! entries total). "qujannami"/"qujannamik" (a 4th spelling, "mik", plus
! "naq"/1vv's own "nna" spelling and a "quja" root) not attempted: more
! unexplained variation than 2 words can justify guessing a rule from.
++miik+1vn:mi # ;
++miik+1vn:mii # ;
++miik+1vn:miik # ;
++miik+1vn:NASALmi # ;
++miik+1vn:NASALmii # ;
++miik+1vn:NASALmiik # ;

! "juq" also reaches a THIRD continuation, straight into a noun ending:
! "ajjigiinngittunik" needs it (juq -> nik/tn-acc-p) -- juq (verb-to-noun)
! had otherwise only ever continued to "#" or into another nv-suffix,
! never directly to a noun ending. Routed to a dedicated
! "NounEndingsAfterQTriggerSuffix" lexicon below (rather than the shared
! "NounEndings", where "nik" ALSO independently lives, for the general
! case): several endings' own CSV rows delete a preceding q specifically
! when the id of what precedes them is juq/1vn (or ksaq/1nn, jaq/3vn/1vn
! -- a genuinely id-conditional context, "Lever A", see NounEndings
! above). Scoping it to a dedicated lexicon means this q-deletion stays
! specific to "reached right after one of these specific trigger
! suffixes" -- it doesn't leak into the general NounEndings case, whose
! own q-context uses a DIFFERENT mechanism (Nasalization by default).
++juq+1vn:juq NounEndingsAfterQTriggerSuffix ;

++ji+1vn:ji NounContinuations ;
++ji+1vn:ji # ;

! "uqartii" needs the preceding root's own trailing q converted to r
! (VOICE) before "ji" attaches -- root "uqaq" (very common) has no
! reduced spelling of its own, so the conversion has to happen on ji's
! side, same VOICE-prefixed-candidate shape as juq/1vn's own "VOICEtu"
! elsewhere in this file. The literal is "ti" (own j ALREADY converted
! to t), not "ji" -- VOICE resolves early in phonology.xfscript's rule
! cascade, well BEFORE the general j->t rule at the very top, so
! "VOICEji" would never actually see "r" adjacent to "j" in time for
! that rule to fire (confirmed via a failed hfst-lookup attempt with
! "VOICEji" first: produced "uqarjii", j unconverted). Baking the t
! directly into the literal sidesteps the ordering issue entirely, same
! as juq/1vn's own "VOICEtu" already does. Not decomposable by the real
! Java analyzer either (confirmed via --pipeline).
++ji+1vn:VOICEti NounContinuations ;

! "jjut"/1vn ("reason/cause/motive for doing s.t."): same "one who/reason
! for X" shape as "ji"/1vn just above, wired identically (bare "jjut"
! terminal, continuing "jjuti", same 4 continuations). "katimajjutiksaq"
! also needed a bare (non-SUPPR) terminal candidate for ksaq/1nn below --
! own trailing q kept, since gold wants "ksaq" not "ksa" when it's the
! FINAL morpheme. q-context ("rut"/"ruti", Fusion) not attempted: no gold
! word in this cluster needs it.
++jjut+1vn:jjut # ;
++jjut+1vn:jjut NounContinuations ;
++jjut+1vn:jjuti NounContinuations ;

! "gaq"/1vn: "makpigaq" = {makpi:makpiq/1v}{gaq:gaq/1vn} -- verb-to-noun
! derivational suffix ("forms a noun with an inherently passive
! meaning"). Same shape as juq/1vn and kkut/1nn: Suffixes.csv's row has
! one deterministic candidate per context (V-form/action Neutral,
! t/k/q-form Suppression, all literally "gaq" itself unchanged) --
! genuine rule, reuses the existing SUPPR marker exactly like
! "liri"/"qai"/"kkut" (delete the preceding stem's final q/k/t,
! "makpiq"->"makpi", then append "gaq"). Also continues into NnSuffixes
! ("maligaksait" needs "ksaq"/1nn to attach directly after "gaq"), into
! NounEndings directly ("maligarmut"/"maligarmi"/"maligarmik"/
! "maligarnit" all attach a tn-ending directly onto "gaq" with no
! intervening "ksaq", reaching the generic non-trigger Lever A branch
! there -- confirmed by the attested surface "gar", Nasalization, not
! "ga", Suppression, since "gaq"/1vn is not one of Lever A's trigger
! ids), and into NvSuffixes (so a noun-to-verb suffix like "liuq" can
! follow: "maligaliuqti" = mali(malik/1v)+ga(gaq/1vn)+liuq(liuq/1nv)+
! ti(ji/1vn)).
++gaq+1vn:SUPPRgaq # ;
++gaq+1vn:SUPPRgaq NounContinuations ;

! "usiq"/1vn ("custom/way/habit"): Suffixes.csv's q-form lists three
! candidates ("usiq"/"usiq"/"qusiq") with actions Suppression/Voicing/
! Neutral -- but gold reveals SIX distinct literal spellings are actually
! needed, not three, because usiq's own trailing q behaves differently
! depending on what FOLLOWS it (own q kept bare, own q deleted, own q
! converted to r) -- the CSV under-lists the real variation. All six are
! wired as parallel literal spellings (different strings, no collision),
! each also carrying its own SUPPR prefix to delete the PRECEDING root's
! trailing q where gold needs that ("uqaq" family) -- except the
! "q"-prefixed trio (qusiq/qusi/qusir), which do NOT delete the preceding
! q, matching the "apiq" family's doubled-q surface ("apiqqusi..."013).
! Confirmed via:
!   - "uqausiq" (bare terminal): uqaq's own q deleted (SUPPR) + "usiq"
!     kept whole -- SUPPRusiq -> "#".
!   - "uqausiqtigut": same SUPPRusiq, reaching "tigut"/tn-via-p (which has
!     no SUPPR of its own, so usiq's own q must survive here too).
!   - "uqausiit"/"uqausiksait"/"uqausiksangit"/"uqausikkut"/
!     "uqausilirinirmut": SUPPRusiq would ALSO work here (the following
!     ending's own SUPPR eats usiq's trailing q for free), but "uqausinga"/
!     "uqausingit" need usiq's own q gone even though "nga" carries no
!     SUPPR marker at all -- so a genuinely separate "SUPPRusi" (own q
!     already gone) candidate is needed; wired uniformly rather than
!     picking per-word which of SUPPRusiq/SUPPRusi would happen to work.
!   - "uqausirmik"/"uqausirnik"/"uqausirnut": own q converted to r
!     (SUPPRusir) -- mik/nik/nut all already have their own bare/NASAL/
!     SUPPR variants from Lever A, and it's the BARE one that matches here
!     (SUPPRusir + bare "mik" = "usirmik").
!   - "apiqqusiit"/"apiqqusiksait": "qusiq" (own q kept, preceding q also
!     kept -- doubled "qq") -- the following SUPPR-marked ending eats
!     qusiq's own trailing q the same way as the uqaq family.
!   - "apiqqusirnut": "qusir" (own q -> r, preceding q kept).
!   - "apiqqusira"/"apiqqusirijara": would need "qusi" reaching
!     "ga"/tn-nom-s-1s and "gi"/1nv respectively -- both remain unreached
!     for other reasons (see "gi"/1nv's own comment below).
! "uqausirijanga"/"uqausissangit"/"uqausitsangit"/"uqausituinnakkut" also
! remain unreached: the first needs "jaq"/1vn chained after "gi"/1nv
! (gi's own continuations don't reach jaq yet), the middle two need
! "ssaq"/"tsaq" spelling variants of ksaq/1nn that don't exist, the last
! needs checking whether "tuinnaq"/2nn and "kkut"/1nn chain together the
! way this word needs -- none blocked by usiq itself, all separate small
! gaps left for a future pass.
++usiq+1vn:SUPPRusiq # ;
++usiq+1vn:SUPPRusiq NounContinuations ;
++usiq+1vn:SUPPRusi NounContinuations ;
++usiq+1vn:SUPPRusir NounContinuations ;
++usiq+1vn:qusiq # ;
++usiq+1vn:qusiq NounContinuations ;
++usiq+1vn:qusi NounContinuations ;
++usiq+1vn:qusir NounContinuations ;

! "ut"/1vn ("object/instrument/tool for doing s.t."): Suffixes.csv's
! V-form alone lists 12 space-separated candidates. Tracing every gold
! word's FULL decomposition chain instead shows it's the same "CSV under/
! over-lists, gold reveals the real literal-spelling set" shape as usiq
! above, just with MORE candidates because "ut" genuinely has three
! parallel sub-families, not one:
!   - V-context, own trailing q handled by SUPPR (root already q-final,
!     e.g. "ikajuq"): SUPPRut (bare terminal, "ikajuutit"), SUPPRuti
!     (continuing), SUPPRutik (alt bare terminal), SUPPRutaq (alt bare
!     terminal, own q survives unless a FOLLOWING SUPPR-marked ending eats
!     it -- "iksivautaq" bare vs "iksivautaup" via up/tn-gen-s's own SUPPR,
!     same "downstream SUPPR reduces utaq->uta for free" trick as usiq).
!   - q-prefix family (preceding root's own q is KEPT, doubled "qq" --
!     "apiq" family): qut/quti/qutik, no SUPPR at all, mirrors usiq's
!     qusiq/qusi/qusir treatment exactly.
!   - r-prefix family (preceding root's own trailing q IS deleted, by
!     ut's OWN SUPPR -- "giaq"/1vv and "liuq"/1nv's output): SUPPRrut
!     (bare terminal, "ilagiarut"), SUPPRruti (continuing,
!     "ilagiaruti"/"qaujigiarutit" -- "qaujigiarutit" needs bare SUPPRrut
!     + it, not SUPPRruti; both "rut"+it and "ruti"+it are gold-attested
!     free variants, same "apiqqutit"/"apiqqutiit" doubling seen in the
!     q-prefix family too).
!   - V-context gemination family: the CSV's own V-form actually lists
!     "jjut jjuti jjutik jjutaq" a SECOND time via action1 "i(jj)"
!     (Insertion of doubled "j") -- this IS the "mysterious jj-prefixed
!     spelling" this comment used to describe as "not in the CSV's own
!     candidate list at all" (round 22-era investigation missed it,
!     mistaking it for the separate, genuinely distinct "jjut"/1vn
!     suffix, Suffixes.csv nb=1 "reason/cause/motive", instead). Baked
!     directly into the literal text (same "unconditional insertion"
!     treatment as lugu/lugit's own "i(l)" case), not a marker: confirmed
